Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 23 Election Offenses

17-23-1.
Signature and labeling of advertising in periodicals.

No person shall publish or cause to be published in any newspaper or other periodical, either in its advertising or reading columns, any paid matter designed or tending to aid, injure, or defeat any candidate for public office or any question submitted to the voters, unless the name of the chairperson or secretary or the names of two (2) officers of the political or other organization inserting the paid matter, or the name of some voter who is responsible for it, with that person’s residence and the street and number, if any, appear in the paid matter in the nature of a signature. The matter inserted in reading columns shall be preceded by or followed by the word “advertisement” in a separate line, in type not smaller than that of the body type of the newspaper or other periodical.

History of Section.

P.L. 1923, ch. 457, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-23-2.
Signature of posters, fliers, and circulars.

No person shall intentionally write, print, post, or distribute, or cause to be written, printed, posted, or distributed, a circular, flier, or poster designed or tending to injure or defeat any candidate for nomination or election to any public office, by criticizing the candidate’s personal character or political action, or designed or tending to aid, injure, or defeat any question submitted to the voters, unless there appears upon the circular, flier, or poster in a conspicuous place the name of the author and either the names of the chairperson and secretary, or of two (2) officers, of the political or other organization issuing the poster, flier, or circular, or of some voter who is responsible for it, with the voter’s name and residence, and the street and numbers, if any.

History of Section.

P.L. 1923, ch. 457, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 282, § 1.

17-23-3.
Penalty for advertising violations.

Whoever violates any provision of §

17-23-1

or §

17-23-2

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1923, ch. 457, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-4.
Fraudulent or repeat voting.

Every person who, in any election, fraudulently votes or attempts to vote, not being qualified, notwithstanding that person’s name may be on the voting list at the polling place where the person votes or attempts to vote; or who votes or attempts to vote in the name of some other person, whether that name is that of a person living or dead, or of a fictitious person; or having voted in one town, ward, senatorial district, representative district, or voting district, whether the person’s vote in that case was legal or not, votes or attempts to vote in the same or in another town, ward, senatorial district, representative district, or voting district; or who fraudulently votes or attempts to vote in a town, ward, senatorial district, representative district, or voting district other than in the town, ward, senatorial district, representative district, or voting district in which the person has his or her “residence”, as defined in §

17-1-3.1

, at the time of his or her voting or attempting to vote; or who aids, counsels, or procures any other person to so vote or attempt to vote, shall be guilty of a felony, and no person after conviction of this offense, shall be permitted to vote in any election or upon any proposition pending before the people, or to hold any public office. Voting, for the purposes of this chapter, shall consist in the casting of a vote, or attempting to cast a vote, whether or not the vote has been cast.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1907, ch. 1426, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 2; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 23; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 6.

17-23-5.
Bribery or intimidation of voters — Immunity of witnesses in bribery trials.

Every person who directly or indirectly gives, or offers to agree to give, to any elector or to any person for the benefit of any elector, any sum of money or other valuable consideration for the purpose of inducing the elector to give in or withhold that elector’s vote at any election in this state, or by way of reward for having voted or withheld that elector’s vote, or who uses any threat or employs any means of intimidation for the purpose of influencing the elector to vote or withhold that elector’s vote for or against any candidate or candidates or proposition pending at an election, shall be guilty of a felony, and no person after conviction of this offense, shall be permitted to vote in any election or upon any proposition pending before the people, or to hold any public office; and no evidence given by any witness testifying upon the trial of any charge of bribery shall be used against the person giving the evidence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 3; P.L. 1907, ch. 1428, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 3; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2468, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-6.
Improper influence by employers.

Every person being an employer who, within ninety (90) days of a general election, pays any of his or her employees the salary or wages due them in “pay envelopes” upon which there is written or printed, or in which there is inserted: (1) a notice or information, to the effect that if any particular ticket or candidate is elected or defeated, work in the employer’s place or establishment will cease, in whole or in part, or the employer’s establishment will be closed, or the wages of the employer’s employees will be reduced, or (2) any political motto, device, or argument containing threats, expressed or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political actions or opinions of the employees, or who puts up or otherwise exhibits, in the employer’s establishment or place where the employer’s employees are engaged in labor, any handbill or placard containing any such notice or information or threat, shall be guilty of a felony.

Any person, after conviction of this offense, shall forfeit that person’s right to vote in any election or upon any proposition before the people, or to hold any public office, except that a corporation shall forfeit its charter; and no evidence given by any witness testifying in the trial of any charge of violation of this section shall be used against the person giving the evidence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 3; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2468, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-7.
Protection of names of major parties.

It shall be unlawful for any club or society or association, whether incorporated or not, to include in its name the word “republican” or “democrat” or any designation indicating its affiliation with a political party, unless:

If it is state or congressional district wide in its membership or activities, it has the written consent for the inclusion of the state central committee of the republican or democratic party, as the case may be;

If it is city or town wide in its membership or activities, it has the written consent for the inclusion of the city or town committee of the republican or democratic party, as the case may be, of the city or town in which its activities are or are to be centered;

If it is ward or voting district wide in its membership or activities, it has a written consent for the inclusion of the ward committee of the republican or democratic party, as the case may be, of the ward in which its activities are or are to be centered;

If it is senatorial or representative district wide in its membership or activities, it has the written consent for the inclusion of the district committee of the republican or democratic party, as the case may be, of the senatorial or representative district, as the case may be, in which its activities are or are to be centered.

Every member and every officer of any club, society, or association, whether incorporated or not, violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

Upon the written request of one member of the committee from which consent for the inclusion should have been obtained as provided in this section, the attorney general shall institute appropriate court proceedings to prevent continued violations of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1714, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 23; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-8.
Failure to furnish certificate of election.

Every city or town clerk or local board required by law to furnish any city, town, ward, or voting district officer elect with a proper certificate of the officer’s election who neglects or refuses to do so, as soon as possible after the election, shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 829, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 10, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 10, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-9.
Violations as to nomination papers or withdrawals — Protection of party emblems.

Any person who falsely makes, or willfully defaces or destroys, any certificate of nomination or nomination paper, or any part of it, or any letter of withdrawal, or files any certificate of nomination or nomination paper or letter of withdrawal, knowing it or any part of it to be falsely made, or suppresses any certificate of nomination or nomination paper or letter of withdrawal, or any part of it, which has been duly filed, and any person or persons who prints, stamps, or affixes, or causes to be printed, stamped, or affixed, upon any letterhead, circular, or pamphlet used for political purposes, or upon political literature of any nature, a representation of the chosen emblem or device of any political party in this state without having first obtained the consent, in writing, of the chairperson of the state central committee of the political party whose chosen emblem or device is sought to be used for these purposes, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 45; P.L. 1905, ch. 1229, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, § 50; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-10.
Violations by public officers generally.

Any public officer, upon whom a duty is imposed by this title, who willfully neglects to perform his or her duty, or who performs it in a way that hinders the objects of this title, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 11, § 46; G.L. 1909, ch. 11, § 51; G.L. 1923, ch. 11, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 13.

17-23-11.
Limitation of prosecutions — Payment to complainant.

All prosecutions for offenses against the provisions of this chapter shall commence within one year after the offenses have been committed, and not afterwards. And upon the presentation of a certificate of the clerk of any court of the final conviction in the court of any person under the provisions of this chapter, the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her order on the general treasurer for the sum of fifty dollars ($50), and deliver the sum to the person complainant in the prosecution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 325, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

17-23-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-23-12.
Qualification of person obtaining signatures.

No person, except one qualified to sign a petition for the adoption of a home rule charter as provided in § 6 of article XIII of the Constitution of this state, shall circulate any petition, or obtain signatures on any petition, and any petition circulated, or any signature obtained, by any unqualified person shall be null and void for all purposes.

Nor shall any person not qualified as provided in subsection (a) of this section, obtain signatures on nomination papers of any elector seeking to be a candidate at any election held for the purpose of selecting the members of a charter commission, and any signature appearing on any nomination paper which has been obtained by one not qualified shall be null and void for all purposes.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor; and any person who, knowing that he or she is not qualified pursuant to the Constitution, willfully signs any petition for the adoption of a home rule charter, or the nomination papers of any candidate for a position on a charter commission, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 77.

17-23-13.
Sound equipment.

No sound equipment advocating the election or defeat of any candidate or the approval or disapproval of any referenda shall be allowed within five hundred (500) feet of any polling place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 200, § 2.

17-23-14.
Political advertising.

No newspaper, periodical, radio, or television station shall charge for a political advertisement a sum greater than that charged by the medium for advertisement if it were nonpolitical. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions of this section and, upon conviction, a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 64, § 1.

17-23-15.
Polling or surveying of voter opinion.

No person shall conduct any form of poll or survey of voter opinion or voter conduct within a building or within fifty (50) feet of the entrance or entrances to a building in which voting is being conducted at any primary or election; provided, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to apply to or to affect the activities of election officials or election inspectors, or “checkers”, “runners”, and “watchers” as defined in §

17-19-22

.

Notice of this section shall be posted in a conspicuous place at all polling places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 192, § 1.

17-23-16.
Guaranteed access in exchange for contributions prohibited.

As defined in §

17-2-1

, no general officer and no candidate for a general office shall solicit campaign contributions by guaranteeing to all contributors of a specified minimum amount of money, as a quid pro quo for their contributions, the right to meet with the general officer or candidate on a predetermined number of occasions. The phrase “the right to meet” shall not be construed to include the holding of a one time public fundraising event at which the general officer or candidate is present.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 367, § 1.

17-23-17.
Violations with respect to elections.

Any person is guilty of a felony who:

Makes a declaration of candidacy or obtains, circulates, or causes to be circulated his or her nomination papers for an office, knowing or with good reason to know that he or she is not qualified as provided in this title to be his or her party’s candidate for the office;

Knowingly or without reasonable and proper investigation makes any substantial misstatement in any declaration of candidacy, nomination paper, or affidavit provided for in this title;

Signs a nomination paper when he or she knows that he or she is not qualified to sign;

Votes or attempts to vote at any election when he or she knows or should know that he or she is not qualified to vote;

Votes or attempts to vote more than once at any election, or votes or attempts to vote in more than one political party’s primary on the same day;

Votes or attempts to vote at any election under the name of any other person;

Willfully hinders the orderly conduct of any election;

Gives a false answer to any election official relative to his or her right to vote at the election;

Aids or abets a person not entitled to vote at any election in voting or attempting to vote under a name other than the voter’s name or in voting twice upon the voter’s name;

Willfully alters or makes any change, erasure, or additional check upon the voting list used or to be used at any election; or

Willfully violates any provisions of chapters 12 — 15 of this title for which violation a specific penalty is not provided.

Any person who unlawfully and knowingly signs the name of any other person on any nomination papers shall be guilty of a felony.

Any public officer or officer of a political party who willfully violates any of the provisions of chapters 12 — 15 of this title, or refuses or willfully neglects and omits to perform, in the manner and within the time prescribed, any duty imposed upon the officer by these chapters, or suffers or permits any alteration, erasure, or additional check to be made upon a voting list in the officer’s custody or control, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 147, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 139, § 2.

17-23-18.
Political advertising from official budgets prohibited.

Except in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no elected official shall permit the expenditure of public funds from any official budget under his or her authority for any publication, advertisement, broadcast, or telecast of his or her photograph, voice, or other likeness to be broadcast or distributed to the public during the one hundred and twenty (120) days preceding any primary or general election in which he or she is a candidate.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit an official from appearing on regular capitol television programming operated by the general assembly or on television stations operated by the Rhode Island PBS Foundation during the period of time or programming of regular or special meetings of city or town councils or any local governmental board, agency or other entity.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the publication, broadcast, or telecast of any photograph, voice, or other likeness of an elected official that is distributed to the public by or through an official government website or social media presence provided that the website or social media presence is continuously maintained in the regular course of official government business exclusively for general informational or transparency purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 302, § 1.

17-23-19.
Referenda advertisements.

Media outlets in Rhode Island that sell time for advertisements pertaining to referenda questions at an election shall require the purchasers of the advertisements to prominently display the state in which the referenda election is to be held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 399, § 1.